Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-103.01
Containers or portable tanks, defined.

For the purposes of sections 66-103 to 66-106, containers or portable tanks shall mean containers or portable tanks which conform to standards which the State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate by rules and regulations. The State Fire Marshal may adopt the standards, or any part of such standards, recommended for containers or portable tanks by the National Fire Protection Association.

Laws 1985, LB 441, § 2.